District of Columbia statutes.
41-116

Unpaid wages or other compensation.

Wages or other compensation for personal services held or owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business that have remained unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after the compensation becomes payable or distributable are presumed abandoned.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 116, 27 DCR 5150
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1701(k), 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 42-216.

Section 1701(k) of D.C. Law 12-59 rewrote the section.

Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary amendment of section, see § 1701(k) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 1701(k) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).